Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1306
Budget; submit to county board; levy; tax.

Before July 1 of each calendar year, the board of directors shall prepare an itemized budget of funds needed for the next fiscal year which are necessary to carry out the authorities granted under sections 74-1302, 74-1303, and 74-1305. The board of directors shall transmit such budget to the county board. The county board shall levy a tax sufficient to produce the amount of funds requested but not to exceed two and six-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all taxable property in the county subject to section 77-3443. Such levy shall be in addition to all other levies authorized or limited by law. The tax so levied shall be collected in the same manner as other property taxes, and the proceeds therefrom shall be kept in a separate account identified by the official name of the transportation district. The county treasurer shall transfer such funds to the district as requested by the board of directors.

Laws 1971, LB 919, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 190;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 161;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 66.